Louisiana, session 2026, HB731.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:554.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§554.1. No implied obligations for pipeline servitudes covered by contract
A. Definitions. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "Pipeline" means any pipeline, gathering line, transmission line,
distribution line, or associated appurtenance, whether onshore or offshore, used or
intended for the transportation, injection, sequestration, storage, or movement of any
gaseous, liquid, supercritical, or multiphase substance, including but not limited to:
(a) Natural gas, methane, hydrogen, carbon dioxide.
(b) Crude oil, refined petroleum products, natural gas liquids.
(c) Produced water, brine, or other substances regulated by state or federal
law.
(2) "Pipeline operator" means any person or entity that owns, operates,
maintains, or controls a pipeline.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1227 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 731
B. Regulation of servitude by contract. Notwithstanding Civil Code Article
645 or any other provision of law to the contrary, when a right of use for a pipeline
is created by a conventional obligation, the laws contained in Title III of Book II of
the Civil Code (Personal Servitudes) and Title IV of Book II of the Civil Code
(Predial Servitude) cannot impose on the pipeline operator any affirmative duty that
is not expressly stated in the contract.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act are intended to be interpretive of the original
intent of existing law and shall not be interpreted as a substantive change in the law. The
provisions of this Act shall be given prospective and retroactive application and shall apply
to all claims and causes of action that have not been resolved by settlement or judicial award
on or before the effective date of this Act.